Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-8,205
Injunction; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

Any person who violates a permanent injunction obtained pursuant to section 81-8,204,
presents or attempts to file as his or
her own the certificate of licensure of another, gives false or forged evidence
of any kind to the board in obtaining a certificate of licensure, indorses any document which he or she did not actually prepare
or supervise the preparation thereof, falsely impersonates another practitioner of like or
different name, or uses a
revoked certificate of licensure shall be deemed
guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 22, p. 1866;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 300;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 23.